Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.16.010

Certification—Effect—Penalty.

No director, officer, agent or employee of any bank shall certify a check unless the amount thereof actually stands to the credit of the drawer on the books of such corporation and when certified must be charged to the account of the drawer. Every violation of this provision shall be a gross misdemeanor. Any such check so certified by a duly authorized person shall be a good and valid obligation of the bank in the hands of an innocent holder.

[ 2014 c 37 s 189; 1955 c 33 s 30.16.010. Prior: 1917 c 80 s 44; RRS s 3251. Formerly RCW 30.16.010.]